Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB247.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 305(b)(1), 504(b) and (c) and 505(a) of Title 26 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 305. Notice to condemnee.* * *(b) Service.--(1) The notice shall be served, within or without this Commonwealth, by any competent adult in the same manner as in a civil action or by [registered] certified mail to the last known address of the person being served.* * *§ 504. Appointment of viewers.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(b) Service of petition for the appointment of viewers and order appointing viewers.--The petitioners shall promptly send to all other parties by [registered] certified mail, return receipt requested, a certified true copy of the petition for the appointment of viewers and a copy of the court order appointing the viewers if an order has been entered. A copy of the petition and order, if entered, shall also be mailed to all mortgagees and other lienholders of record.(c) Notice of views and hearings.--The viewers shall give notice of the time and place of all views and hearings. The notice shall be given to all parties by not less than 30 days written notice by [registered] certified mail, return receipt requested.* * *§ 505. Service of notice of view and hearing.(a) General rule.--Notice of the view and hearing shall be served, within or without this Commonwealth, by any competent adult in the same manner as a civil action or by [registered] certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the condemnee and condemnor.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0247PN0197 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223